Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4905
Director of Administrative Services; warrants.

The Director of Administrative Services is hereby authorized and directed to draw his warrants upon the proper funds in the state treasury for, but never in excess of, the sums herein specified upon presentation of proper vouchers. The State Treasurer shall pay the warrants out of money in the proper funds not otherwise appropriated.

Laws 1972, LB 1270, § 6.